Arkansas, session 2025, HB1300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 11, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1161. Prior Authorization Transparency Act Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Prior Authorization Transparency Act Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of all moneys received by the Insurance
*ANS073*
03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/3/25 H3/13/25 HB1300
Commissioner for the fines under § 23-99-1116.
(c)(1) The fund shall be administered by and disbursed at the
direction of the commissioner.
(2) Moneys shall not be appropriated from the fund for any
purpose except:
(A) To inform and educate healthcare providers and
subscribers about the requirements of the Prior Authorization Transparency
Act, § 23-99-1101 et seq.; and
(B) To improve the ability of the State Insurance
Department to:
(i) Assess compliance with the Prior Authorization
Transparency Act, § 23-99-1101 et seq.;
(ii) Assess compliance with other laws and
regulations applicable to healthcare insurers and utilization review
entities; and
(iii) Improve enforcement of state law and rules
applicable to a healthcare insurer, utilization review entity, healthcare
contracting entity, and other related entities.
(d) All moneys deposited into the fund shall not be subject to a
deduction, tax, levy, or other type of assessment.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1103(10), concerning the definition
of "health service" under the Prior Authorization Transparency Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(10)(A) "Healthcare service" means a healthcare procedure,
treatment, or service provided by a healthcare provider.
(B) "Healthcare service" includes without limitation the
provision of pharmaceutical products or services or durable medical equipment
that is identifiable by:
(i) The Current Procedural Terminology code;
(ii) The Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System
code; or
(iii) The National Drug Code;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1103(15), concerning the definition
of "prior authorization" under the Prior Authorization Transparency Act, is
03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/3/25 H3/13/25 HB1300
amended to read as follows:
(15)(A) “Prior authorization” means the process by which a
utilization review entity determines the medical necessity of an otherwise
covered healthcare service before the healthcare service is rendered,
including without limitation preadmission review, pretreatment review,
utilization review, case management, and fail first protocol a process,
requirement, or administrative function mandated by a utilization review
entity that shall be completed by a healthcare provider or subscriber as a
condition of coverage determination or condition of payment determination for
a healthcare service before the healthcare service is rendered.
(B) "Prior authorization" may include, unless otherwise
provided under this subchapter or otherwise inapplicable, includes without
limitation:
(i) Preadmission review;
(ii) Pretreatment review;
(iii) Precertification;
(iv) Predetermination;
(v) Prospective utilization review;
(vi) Concurrent review;
(vii) Fail first protocols;
(viii) Medical necessity determination;
(ix) Prior notification; and
(x) the The requirement that a subscriber or
healthcare provider notify the health insurer or utilization review entity of
the subscriber's intent to receive a healthcare service before the healthcare
service is provided;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1104 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1104. Disclosure required.
(a)(1)(A) A utilization review entity shall disclose all of its prior
authorization requirements, clinical criteria, and restrictions in a publicly
accessible manner on its website.
(B) The disclosure under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section shall be explained in detail and in clear and ordinary terms, and
include:
(i)(a) A list of any healthcare services that
03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/3/25 H3/13/25 HB1300
require prior authorization.
(b) The list under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)(a)
of this section shall:
(1) Be available in a format that can be
easily understood by a subscriber and in a machine-readable format that
allows for automated retrieval and processing; and
(2) Include the following information:
(A) The name of the healthcare
service and any billing codes associated with the healthcare service; and
(B)(i) The effective date and end
date of the prior authorization requirement policy for the healthcare
service.
(ii) A healthcare service that no longer requires a
prior authorization shall remain on the list for two (2);
(ii)(a) Any written clinical criteria for services
that require prior authorizations.
(b) The information described in subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(ii)(a) of this section shall be explained in detail and in clear
and ordinary terms; and
(iii) Any written clinical criteria for services
that do not require prior authorization but are subject to review for medical
necessity.
(2) The information described in subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall be explained in detail and in clear and ordinary terms.
(3)(A)(2)(A) Utilization review entities that have agreed, by
contract with vendors or third-party administrators, to use licensed,
proprietary, or copyrighted protected clinical criteria from the vendors or
administrators may satisfy the disclosure requirement under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section by making all relevant proprietary clinical criteria
available to a healthcare provider that submits a prior authorization request
to the utilization review entity through a secured link on the utilization
review entity's website that is accessible to the healthcare provider from
the public part of its website as long as any link or access restrictions to
the information do not cause any delay to the healthcare provider.
(B) For out-of-network providers, a utilization review
entity may meet the requirements of this subdivision (a)(3)(a)(2) by:
03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/3/25 H3/13/25 HB1300
(i) Providing the healthcare provider with temporary
electronic access in a timely manner to a secure site to review copyright-
protected clinical criteria; or
(ii) Disclosing copyright-protected clinical
criteria in a timely manner to a healthcare provider through other electronic
or telephonic means.
(b) Before a utilization review entity implements a new or amended
prior authorization requirement, clinical criteria, or restriction as
described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the utilization review
entity shall update its website to reflect the new or amended requirement or
restriction.
(c)(1) Before implementing a new or amended prior authorization
requirement, clinical criteria, or restriction, a utilization review entity
shall provide contracted healthcare providers written notice of the new or
amended requirement or restriction at least sixty (60) days before
implementation of the new or amended requirement or restriction.
(2) As used in subdivision (c)(1) of this section, "written
notice" means actual notice to the healthcare provider via mail, email, or
fax.
(d)(1) A utilization review entity shall make statistics available
regarding prior authorization approvals and denials on its website in a
readily accessible format.
(2) The statistics made available by a utilization review entity
under this subsection shall categorize approvals and denials by:
(A) Physician specialty;
(B) Medication or diagnostic test or procedure;
(C) Medical indication offered as justification for the
prior authorization request; and
(D) Reason for denial.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1104, concerning the disclosure
requirements under the Prior Authorization Transparency Act, is amended to
add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) If a utilization review entity provides information to a
healthcare provider indicating that a prior authorization is not required for
a specific healthcare service, then the utilization review entity shall
03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/3/25 H3/13/25 HB1300
disclose any other restriction, limitation, or requirement that may preclude
coverage of the specific healthcare service, including without limitation:
(A) A step therapy requirement;
(B) A restriction on the place of the specific healthcare
service;
(C) A restriction on the healthcare provider type or benefit
category;
(D) Clinical criteria that completely excludes the specific
healthcare service from coverage; and
(E) Any post-service review, information request, or audit
responsibility that is applicable to the specific healthcare service based on
the billing code or category.
(2)(A) Subdivision (e)(1) of this section does not apply if a
utilization review entity provides a document on the utilization review
entity's website or in a format available to download from the utilization
review entity's website that includes the following information in an
aggregated format:
(i) A list of step therapy requirements;
(ii) A list of any restrictions on the site of
service for a specific healthcare service, to the extent that the restriction
deviates from the requirements under Medicare;
(iii) A list of any restrictions to the benefit
category of a specific healthcare service, to the extent that the restriction
deviates from the requirements under Medicare;
(iv) A list of any specific healthcare services that
are completely excluded from coverage based on clinical criteria; and
(v) A list of any specific healthcare services for
which the billing code or category requires a post-service review,
information request, or audit.
(B) The document under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this
section shall include the name of the healthcare service and any billing
codes associated with the healthcare service.
(C) A utilization review entity shall provide a contracted
healthcare provider written notice of any changes to the document under
subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section at least sixty (60) days before
implementation of the change via mail, email, or fax.
03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/3/25 H3/13/25 HB1300

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1109(c), concerning payment of a
claim by a healthcare insurer regardless of terminology under the Prior
Authorization Transparency Act, is amended to read as follows:
(c) A healthcare insurer shall pay a claim for a healthcare service
for which prior authorization was received regardless of the terminology used
by the utilization review entity or health benefit plan when reviewing the
claim, unless:
(1) The authorized healthcare service was never performed;
(2) The submission of the claim for the healthcare service with
respect to the subscriber was not timely under the terms of the applicable
provider contract or policy;
(3) The subscriber had not exhausted contract or policy benefit
limitations based on information available to the utilization review entity
or healthcare insurer at the time of the authorization but subsequently
exhausted contract or policy benefit limitations after the authorization was
issued, in which case the utilization review entity or healthcare insurer
shall include language in the notice of authorization to the subscriber and
healthcare provider that the visits or services authorized might exceed the
limits of the contract or policy and would accordingly not be covered under
the contract or policy; or;
(4) There is specific information available for review by the
appropriate state or federal agency that the subscriber or healthcare
provider has engaged in material misrepresentation, fraud, or abuse regarding
the claim for the authorized service; or
(5) The authorization was granted more than ninety (90) days
before the authorized healthcare service is provided.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1109, concerning rescission of prior
authorizations, denial of payment for prior authorized services, and
limitations under the Prior Authorization Transparency Act, is amended to add
an additional subsection to read as follows:
(f)(1) A healthcare insurer shall pay a claim for a healthcare service
under the medical benefit of a health benefit plan in the absence of a prior
authorization if:
(A) At the time the healthcare service was provided, the patient
03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/3/25 H3/13/25 HB1300
had been covered by a health benefit plan for sixty (60) days or less; and
(B) The healthcare service is part of a course of treatment
initiated before the patient is covered by the health benefit plan.
(2) Subdivision (f)(1) of this section does not apply to a
healthcare service provided under the pharmacy benefit of a health benefit
plan.
SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1111(b), concerning the approval of
requests under the Prior Authorization Transparency Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(b)(1) A request for prior authorization may be approved by a
qualified person employed or contracted by a utilization review entity.
(2)(A) The prior authorization under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall:
(i) Be issued for the entire course of treatment
based on a range of dates; and
(ii) Include a period as long as medically
reasonable and necessary to avoid disruptions in care.
(B) If the prior authorization includes an indication for
a number of units, visits, or administrations, the authorized number of
units, visits, or administrations shall be sufficient for the entire course
of treatment.
(C) If the period indicated under subdivision
(b)(2)(A)(ii) of this section exceeds one (1) year, a utilization review
entity may limit the duration of a prior authorization to one (1) year.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1116 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1116. Failure to comply with subchapter — Requested healthcare
services deemed approved Enforcement — Fines.
(a)(1) If For any provision of this subchapter that relates to a
specific request from a healthcare provider for a prior authorization, if a
healthcare insurer or utilization review entity fails to comply with this
subchapter, the requested healthcare services shall be deemed authorized or
approved.
Within two (2) days after a healthcare provider provides notice
that the healthcare insurer or utilization review entity has failed to comply
with this subchapter, the healthcare insurer or utilization
03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/3/25 H3/13/25 HB1300
review entity shall:
(A) Issue the authorization for the requested healthcare
service;
(B) Resend to a healthcare provider any request for
information previously sent to, and unanswered by, the healthcare provider;
or
(C)(i) Refer the matter to the State Insurance Department
for review.
(ii) If the matter is referred to the department
under subdivision (a)(2)(C)(i) of this section, then after notice to the
healthcare insurer or utilization review entity, the Insurance Commissioner
may conduct an investigation and hold a hearing under § 23-66-209, to
determine whether or not the healthcare insurer or utilization review entity
failed to comply with this subchapter.
(iii) If the commissioner finds that the healthcare
insurer or utilization review entity failed to comply with this subchapter,
then the commissioner may order the healthcare insurer or utilization review
entity to:
(a) Issue the authorization for the requested
healthcare service;
(b) Pay the costs of a hearing; and
(c)(1) Pay a monetary penalty as described in
§ 23-66-210(a)(1) of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each
violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of ten thousand dollars
($10,000), unless the person knew or reasonably should have known he or she
was in violation of this subchapter.
(2) If a person knew or reasonably
should have known he or she was in violation of this subchapter, the penalty
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall not be more than five thousand
dollars ($5,000) for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty
amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in any six-month period.
(iv) If the commissioner finds that a healthcare
insurer or utilization review entity has complied with this subchapter, then
the commissioner and the department shall provide notice to:
(a) The healthcare insurer or utilization
review entity; and
03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/3/25 H3/13/25 HB1300
(b) The requesting healthcare provider.
(b) A healthcare service that is authorized or approved under
subsection (a) of this section is not subject to audit recoupment under § 23-
63-1801 et seq.
(c)(1) For any provision of this subchapter not subject to subsection
(a) of this section, if a healthcare insurer or utilization review entity
fails to comply with this subchapter, a healthcare provider may provide
notice to the healthcare insurer or utilization review entity of the failure
to comply.
(2) Within (1) business day after a healthcare provider provides
notice that the healthcare insurer or utilization review entity has failed to
comply with this subchapter, the healthcare insurer or utilization review
entity shall:
(A) Take action to address the failure retrospectively and
prospectively to ensure compliance; or
(B)(i) Refer the matter to the department for review.
(ii) If the matter is referred to the department
under subdivision (c)(2)(B)(i) of this section or by a complaint filed by a
healthcare provider or a subscriber, the commissioner may conduct an
investigation and hold a hearing under § 23-66-209 to determine whether or
not the healthcare insurer or utilization review entity failed to comply with
this subchapter with such frequency as to indicate a general business
practice.
(iii) If the commissioner finds that the healthcare
insurer or utilization review entity failed to comply with this subchapter
with such frequency as to indicate a general business practice, then the
commissioner shall order the healthcare insurer or utilization review entity
to:
(a) Take action to address the failure
retrospectively and prospectively to ensure compliance; and
(b) Pay a civil fine not to exceed five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per day of noncompliance up to one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000).
(C) If the commissioner finds that a healthcare insurer or
utilization review entity has complied with this subchapter, then the
commissioner and the department shall provide notice to:
03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/3/25 H3/13/25 HB1300
(i) The healthcare insurer or utilization review
entity; and
(ii) The requesting healthcare provider.
(d) This section does not prohibit a healthcare provider or subscriber
from filing a complaint with the department based on a violation of this
subchapter.
(e) A fine imposed and collected under this section shall be deposited as
special revenues into the State Treasury and credited to the Prior
Authorization Transparency Act Fund.
(f) A healthcare insurer or utilization review entity does not violate
this subchapter if:
(1) Upon request, a healthcare insurer or a pharmacy benefits
manager shall send additional information from the healthcare provider in
compliance with this subchapter; and
(2) The healthcare provider fails to send the requested
information to the healthcare insurer or utilization review entity.
(g) If the commissioner imposes a fine under this subchapter, the
commissioner shall not impose an additional fine for the same underlying act
or omission under any other provision of state law.

/s/L. Johnson















03-13-2025 10:15:47 ANS073